Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.070

Highways worked seven years are county roads.

All public highways in this state, outside incorporated cities and towns and not designated as state highways, which have been used as public highways for a period of not less than seven years, where they have been worked and kept up at the expense of the public, are county roads.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.75.070. Prior: 1955 c 361 s 2; prior: 1945 c 125 s 1, part; 1937 c 187 s 10, part; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 6450-10, part.]